Hawaii statutes.
§502-22 Copies of plans furnished by
registrar. The registrar shall furnish, when so requested, copies of any
map or plan filed in accordance with sections 502-17 to 502-21, duly certified
by the registrar's seal of office, upon payment of the fee hereinafter
mentioned. In addition, the registrar may authorize the department of
accounting and general services to furnish, when so requested, copies of such
maps or plans, subject to the payment of fees applicable to maps or plans
furnished by the registrar. The copies of maps or plans may be furnished in
photographic, electronic, or electrostatic form. [L 1909, c 49, §2; RL 1925,
§3138; am L 1931, c 63, §6; RL 1935, §5125; RL 1945, §12725; RL 1955, §343-16;
HRS §502-22; am L 1981, c 146, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 2009, c 102, §2(14)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next